Montana, session 2025, HB571.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Automatic dependent surveillance-broadcasts. (1) No For aircraft as defined in
subsection (2)(a), no entity, whether a division of government or a private company or corporation, may use
information broadcast or collected by automatic dependent surveillance-broadcast systems, whether that data
originates from ADS-B In or ADS-B Out, as a means for calculating, generating, and collecting fees from aircraft
owners or operators who operate aircraft within the geographic boundaries of the state.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Aircraft" has the same meaning as provided in 67-1-101, except the aircraft must have a gross
weight of 9,000 pounds or less and operate under Title 14, part 91, Code of Federal Regulations.
(b) "Automatic dependent surveillance-broadcast" means an advanced aviation surveillance
technology that combines an aircraft's positioning source, aircraft avionics, and a ground infrastructure to create
an accurate surveillance interface between an aircraft and air traffic control. The term consists of two different
services, ADS-B In and ADS-B Out, that can provide information, such as an aircraft's global positioning system
location, altitude, ground speed, and other data, to ground stations and other aircraft, as well as weather and
traffic information to aircraft operators.
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
67, chapter 1, part 1, and the provisions of Title 67, chapter 1, part 1, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 571
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 571, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 571
INTRODUCED BY S. KLAKKEN, G. OBLANDER
AN ACT REVISING AERONAUTICS LAWS RELATED TO THE USE OF AUTOMATIC DEPENDENT
SURVEILLANCE-BROADCASTS; AND PROVIDING DEFINITIONS.”